Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB652.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5811YC (2) 91 lh/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 80F.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. This section shall not be construed to 3 require the disclosure, use, or consideration of a confidential 4 communication protected under chapter 622C in any informal 5 inquiry, formal administrative investigation, disciplinary 6 proceeding, or Brady-Giglio determination. 7 Sec. 2. Section 622.10, subsection 9, Code 2026, is amended 8 by striking the subsection and inserting in lieu thereof the 9 following: 10 9. A peer support group counselor who is present for a 11 confidential communication from an officer during a peer 12 support or crisis intervention session shall not be permitted 13 to testify or disclose any confidential communication properly 14 entrusted to the peer support counselor or made in the 15 counselorâs presence by an officer receiving peer support 16 services pursuant to chapter 622C except as provided pursuant 17 to section 622C.2, subsection 3. 18 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 622C.1 Definitions. 19 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 20 requires: 21 1. âConfidential communicationâ means any oral, written, or 22 recorded communication made by an officer to a peer support 23 group counselor while receiving peer support services or crisis 24 intervention, whether the communication is made individually 25 or in a group setting. 26 2. âOfficerâ means a certified law enforcement officer, 27 fire fighter, fire marshal, emergency medical technician, 28 paramedic, medical provider, corrections officer, detention 29 officer, jailer, probation or parole officer, public safety 30 telecommunicator, dispatcher, emergency management coordinator 31 under chapter 29C, or any other public safety employee 32 certified by the Iowa law enforcement academy or state fire 33 marshal and employed by a city, county, or state agency. 34 3. âPeer support group counselorâ means a law enforcement 35 -1- LSB 5811YC (2) 91 lh/jh 1/ 4 H.F. _____ officer, fire fighter, emergency medical services provider, 1 public safety telecommunicator, dispatcher, civilian employee 2 of a law enforcement or fire department, or a nonemployee 3 counselor who has been designated as a peer support group 4 counselor by a sheriff, police chief, fire chief, emergency 5 medical services director, or department head of a public 6 safety agency, and who has received training to provide 7 emotional and moral support, counseling, or crisis intervention 8 to officers and employees affected by stress or trauma arising 9 from official duties. 10 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 622C.2 Confidential peer support 11 communications ââ exceptions. 12 1. Except as provided in subsection 3, a peer support group 13 counselor who is present for a confidential communication 14 from an officer during a peer support or crisis intervention 15 session shall not be permitted to testify or otherwise disclose 16 any confidential communication properly entrusted to the peer 17 support counselor or made in the peer support counselorâs 18 presence by an officer receiving peer support services. 19 2. Except as provided in subsection 3, a confidential 20 communication obtained by a peer support group counselor 21 during the provision of peer support services shall not be 22 used or introduced in any formal administrative investigation, 23 disciplinary proceeding, or Brady-Giglio disclosure or 24 proceeding. 25 3. A peer support group counselor may testify or otherwise 26 disclose a confidential communication if the confidential 27 communication includes any of the following: 28 a. A plan for the commission of a crime or information 29 related to the commission of a crime by the officer. 30 b. An explicit threat of harm to the officer or to another 31 person. 32 c. Information for which disclosure is otherwise required by 33 law, including but not limited to mandatory reporting of child 34 abuse or dependent adult abuse. 35 -2- LSB 5811YC (2) 91 lh/jh 2/ 4 H.F. _____ Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 622C.3 Construction. 1 1. This chapter shall not be construed to limit an 2 employerâs authority to direct an employee to an employee 3 assistance program or to require a fitness-for-duty evaluation. 4 2. This chapter shall be construed liberally to promote 5 candid and confidential communications during peer support 6 services for public safety professionals. 7